Utah statutes.
72-10-210.   Easements for marks or lights -- Condemnation.

(1)  The division and a county, municipality, or airport authority may acquire the right or easement for a term of years or perpetually to place and maintain suitable marks for the daytime, and to place, operate, and maintain suitable lights for the nighttime marking of buildings or other structures or obstructions for the safe operation of aircraft using airports and landing fields acquired or maintained under this chapter.

(2)  The rights or easements may be acquired by grant, purchase, lease, or condemnation in the same manner  provided under Section 72-10-205 for the acquisition or expansion of airports.

